Hawaii statutes.
§432E-1.5 Licensure of managed care plan
medical directors. The medical director of any managed care plan providing
services in the State shall hold an unlimited license to practice medicine or
osteopathic medicine in the State pursuant to chapter 453. [L 1999, c 273, §1;
am L 2009, c 11, §55]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next